src/fst/phonology.twolc
!! # The Faroese morphophonological file 

!! This file documents the [phonology.twolc file](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-fao/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc) 


!! ## Alphabet
!! Here we declare all symbols.

Alphabet
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z æ ø å   !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
 á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ä ë ö ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý þ ñ ð ß ç       !!≈ * **@CODE@** 

 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z Æ Ø Å   !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
 Á É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ù Ì Ä Ë Ö Ü Ï Â Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý þ Ñ Ð           !!≈ * **@CODE@** 


 a2:a  !!≈ * **@CODE@** for invariant a, d.g. vulka2nskur -> vulkanskum
 g2:g  !!≈ * **@CODE@** for invariant g
 i2:i  !!≈ * **@CODE@** for invariant i
 j2:j  !!≈ * **@CODE@** for invariant j
 t2:t  !!≈ * **@CODE@** for invariant, non-deleted t, dráttri pro *drátri
 v2:v  !!≈ * **@CODE@** for invariant v

 a3:a  !!≈ * **@CODE@** a:ø for da3n -> dønum, where normal a:o.

 %^UUML:0 %^IUML:0 %^eIUML:0 %^ØUML:0   !!≈ * **@CODE@** : Umlaut types ,
 %^W:0 %^JI:0                  !!≈ * **@CODE@** : Cns changes ,
 %^EPH:0                       !!≈ * **@CODE@** : Epenthesis,  ,
 %^OEA:0                       !!≈ * **@CODE@** : ø to a
 %^EDH:0 
 %^VSH:0  

 %^GDEL:0 %^GGDEL:0 %^GVDEL:0 %^VDEL:0 %^JDEL:0 %^RDEL:0 	!!≈ * **@CODE@** : Cns deletion triggers,
 %^EIO:0 %^OA:0 %^WVV:0 %^NGKK:0 %^PASS:0
 %^AB1:0 %^AB2:0 %^AB3:0 %^AB4:0 %^AB5:0 %^AB6:0 %^AB7:0	!!≈ * **@CODE@** : Ablaut series ,
 %^aAB:0 %^uAB:0	!!≈ * **@CODE@** : Ablaut series subcases
! %>:0 	!!≈ * **@CODE@** : Suffix border
 
 %[<%] !!≈ * **@CODE@** : Real less than
 %[>%] !!≈ * **@CODE@** : Real greater than
 «7    !!≈ * **@CODE@** : Real quote mark
 »7    !!≈ * **@CODE@** : Real quote mark
 « »   !!≈ * **@CODE@** : Derivational morpheme borders
 %-    !!≈ * **@CODE@** : hyphen at word boundaries
 ;

!! ## Sets
!! Here we define some convenient sets.
Sets


 Vow = a e i o u y æ ø å                                !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
       á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ä ë ö ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý ;    !!≈  **@CODE@** 
 Cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z ð þ ;    !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
 Nas = m n ;                                            !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
 NonNas = b c d f g h j k l p q r s t v w x z ð þ ;     !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
 Dummy = %^UUML %^IUML %^eIUML %^W %^EPH %^JI %^OEA     !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
 %^EDH %^VSH %^GDEL %^GGDEL %^GVDEL %^VDEL %^JDEL       !!≈   **@CODE@** 
 %^RDEL %^EIO %^OA %^WVV %^NGKK %^AB1 %^AB2 %^AB3       !!≈  **@CODE@** 
 %^AB4 %^AB5 %^AB6 %^AB7 %^aAB %^uAB %^PASS %> ;        !!≈  **@CODE@** 
 Special =  %^UUML %^IUML %^W %^EPH %^JI %^OEA %^GDEL %^GGDEL    !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
            %^GVDEL %^VDEL  %^JDEL %^RDEL ;                      !!≈  **@CODE@** 
                                          !! Forgot why these are special...


!! # Rules
!! These are the rules. After each rule (or rather: after many of the rules) there are test cases that are there to test whether the rules work.

Rules


!! ## Verschärfung

"Deleting g"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 g:0 <=> Vow     _     v:  [ %^GVDEL: | %^GDEL: %>: ] ;       !! * Deleting g in gv Verschärfung I
         Vow     _ g:0 j:0  %^GGDEL: %>: [s|n] ;              !! * Deleting first g in ggj Genitive I
         Vow g:  _     j:0 [ %^GDEL: | %^GGDEL: ] %>: [s|n] ; !! * Deleting second g in ggj Genitive II
         Vow :k _ (%>:)  (u: r:) ([Dummy: - %^EPH:]) (Dummy:*) %>: [d|ð|s|t] ([a|i|u]) ; !! * Deleting g in sting:stakst

! "Deleting Double Consonant kk etc. in Front of Consonant"
! !! __@RULENAME@__
!  g:0 <=> Vow :k _ (%>:)  (u: r:) ([Dummy: - %^EPH:]) %>: [d|ð|s|t] ([a|i|u]) ;

!!€ sting^NGKK^aAB>st
!!€ stak0000st


 
"ng to kk Part 1"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** changes n to k in ng:kk before ^NGKK trigger
 n:k <=> Vow _ g: %^NGKK: ;

"ng to kk Part 2"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** changes g to k in ng:kk before ^NGKK trigger
 g:k <=> Vow n: _ %^NGKK: (Dummy:) [#:|%>: Vow:] ;



"Deleting v in gv sequences"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** Verschärverung II gives v:0 for gv:00 before ^GVDEL and in some other contexts
 v:0 <=> Vow g: _ [ %^GVDEL: | [(%^AB1:)| (%^AB5:)|(%^VSH:) | (%^IUML:)] %^VDEL: | %^IUML: %>: i ] ;

!! **Verschärfung tests:***

!!€ bógv^IUML>i
!!€ bøg000i
!!€ flúgv^IUML^VDEL
!!€ flýg000
!!€ flúgv^VSH^VDEL>u
!!€ flug0000u
!!€ búgv^GVDEL>s
!!€ bú0000s
!!€ bógv^VDEL>s
!!€ bóg000s
!!€ skógv^GVDEL>m
!!€ skó0000m
!!€ skýggj^GGDEL>s
!!€ ský00000s
!!€ kríggj^GDEL>s
!!€ kríg0000s
!!€ sjógv^GDEL>ar
!!€ sjó0v00ar

"Deleting r in Genitive of ur stems"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 r:0 <=> u: _ %^EPH: %^RDEL: %>: a r ;

!!€ brúður^EPH^RDEL>ar
!!€ brúð00000ar


"Deleting m in um%>num "
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 m:0 <=> Cns: Dummy:* %>: u _ %>: n u m ; 
         g: v:  Dummy:* %>:   _ %>: n u m ; 

!! **Tests:**

!!€ ris>um>num
!!€ ris0u00num
!!€ skógv^GVDEL>m>num
!!€ skó000000num



"Deleting Double Consonant in Front of Consonant"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 Cx:0 <=> Vow Cx _ (%>:)  (u: r:) ([Dummy: - %^EPH:]) %>: [d|ð|s|t] ([a|i|u]) ;
          Vow Cx _ Dummy:* %>: n (%>:) [a|i|u] ; ! drukk>num
! Cx:0 <=> Vow Cx _ (%>:) (u: r:) (Dummy:) %>: [d|ð|s|(s) t] ([a|i|u]) #:0 ; 
! Cx:0 <=> Vow Cx _ ( %>: u: r: ) ([Dummy: - %^PASS:]) %>: [s|t] #:0 ; 
      where Cx in ( b d f g k l m n p r s t v ) ;

!! The preceeding rule is fishy - the test cases below don't fit the context
!! requirements, and the >s# in the right context seems to indicate passive.
!! The rule conflicts with the "Cns Deletion in front of Pass" rule at the
!! end of the file - but only when using the Xerox tools! XXX - please have a look!

!! **Tests:**

!!€ hjall>s
!!€ hjal00s
!!€ rygg>s
!!€ ryg00s
!!€ hjall>ar
!!€ hjall0ar



!"Double consonant simplification in front of t"
!Cx:0 <=> Vow Cx _ >: t ;
!     where Cx in ( b g l m n p r k ) ;

!!€ all>t
!!€ al00t


!"Deleting Double Consonant in Front of t + vow"
! Cx:0 <=> Vow Cx _ ( (%>:) ( u: r: ) Dummy:) %>: t [a|i|u]  ; 
!      where Cx in ( b d f g k l m n p r s t v ) ;
! added t to right context, check this!!



!! ## Verbal Sandhi rules

"Geminate Assimilation in Past Tense d"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 Cx:0 <=> Vow Cy _ %>: d ;
 	where Cx in ( d ð t )
 	      Cy in ( n r l )
! 	where Cx in ( d ð n p g k t ) ! removing geminates due to prev rule.
! 	      Cy in ( n r n p g k l )
 	      matched ;

"Geminate Assimilation in Past Tense t"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 Cx:0 <=> Vow Cy _ %>: t ;
 	where Cx in ( d ð t ) ! t:0 is covered by the next rule
 	      Cy in ( n r s ) ! l   in front of all consonants
 	      matched ; 

!! **Tests:**
!!€ send>di
!!€ sen00di
!!€ hirð>di
!!€ hir00di
!!€ sett>ti
!!€ set00ti 	      

!"Geminate Assimilation After t Final Stem Cluster"
! t:0 <=> Vow Cns _ %>: t ;


"ð Assimilation in Front of Dental Past Suffix -d(i)"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 ð:d <=> Vow _(%^WVV:) %>: d \d ; ! fjern dette: (%>:) [ #: | Vow ] ;
 
!!€ leið>di
!!€ leid0di 

!"ð Assimilation in Front of Dental Past Suffix -d(i)"
!!! __@RULENAME@__ 
! ð:d <=> Vow  _        %>:0 d  [ #: | Vow ] ;
!         Vow: _ %^WVV: %>:0 d  [ #: | Vow ] ;
!         Vow: _        %>:0 d (%>:) [ #: | Vow ] ;
 
 !! **Tests:**

!!€ leið>di
!!€ leid0di
!!€ greið>di
!!€ greid0di
!!€ ryð^WVV>di
!!€ rud00di


"Deleting Double Consonant in Front of Epenthesis mark"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 Cx:0 <=> Cx _ [i:0|a:0|u:0] [l|r] (%^EPH:) (%^UUML:) %>: Vow ;
      where Cx in ( b d f g k l m n p r s t v ) ;



!! **Tests:**

!!€ summar^EPH>i
!!€ sum00r00i
!!€ himmal^EPH^UUML>um
!!€ him00l000um

!tunnil>i
!tun00l>i
!himmal>i
!him00l0i

"Deleting stem-final s in s genitive"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 s:0 <=> Vow s %>: _ [#:0|%>:] ; ! added #:0

!! **Tests:**

!!€ primus>s
!!€ primus00
!!€ primus>s
!!€ primus00
!!€ grís>s
!!€ grís00


"Double ð Deletion"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
ð:0 <=> _ %>:0 ð ;
        _ %> d d ;


"ð Assimilation in Front of Supine Suffix -t"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 ð:t <=> Vow _ %>: t #: ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ leið>t
!!€ leit0t

"Adjusting Dental Past Suffix -d(i)"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 d:t <=> Vow ([r|l|n]) [ p | t | k | s ] (Dummy:) %>: _ (%>:) [ #: | Vow ] ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ keyp>di
!!€ keyp0ti
!!€ merk>di
!!€ merk0ti

!! ## Adjectival sandhi rules

"Adjective neuter after nlr 1"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
!t:ð <=> Vow Cns+ i [ r: | l: | n: ] ( %^EPH: ) %>: _ #:  ;
t:ð <=> Vow Cns+ i [ r: | l: | n: ]  %^EPH:  %>: _ #:  ;

"Adjective neuter after nlr 2"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
!Cx:0 <=> Vow Cns+ i _ ( %^EPH: ) %>: :ð ;
Cx:0 <=> Vow Cns+ i _  %^EPH:  %>: :ð ;
     where Cx in ( l n r ) ; 	      

!! **Tests:**

!!€ mikil^EPH>t
!!€ miki000ð
!!€ gamal^EPH>t
!!€ gamal00t

"t Deletion in Neuter"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 t:0 <=> [ Cns t | Vow Cns+ Vow ð %^EDH: ] %>: _ #: ;
!t:0 <=> [ r t | Vow Cns+ Vow ð %^EDH: ] %>: _ ;



!! j rules

"Deleting j"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 j:0 <=>           _     [ %^JI: | %^JDEL: ] ;          ! j for j-deletion dummies
         Vow g g:  _ %>: [ Cns | i ] ;                  ! j in j-stems
         Vow g: g: _     [ %^GDEL: | %^GGDEL: ] %>: [s|n] ; ! j in ggj genitive
             Cns   _     [ :i | :ý | :e :y ] Cns:* %^IUML: ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ kríggj^GDEL>num
!!€ kríg0000num	
!!€ beiggj^JI>i
!!€ beigg000i
!!€ verkj^JDEL>ur
!!€ verk000ur
!!€ heyggj>i
!!€ heygg00i


"Realising j in front of vowels"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 j2:j => _ %>: [ a | u ] ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ hylj2>ar
!!€ hylj0ar




!  ===========  !
!! Vowel rules  
!  ===========  !


"Realising i2 as i"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 i2:i => _ %>: ;

!! **Tests:**

!svii2>
!svii>

!! ###  Epenthetic vowel rules

"Epenthetic deletion"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 Vx:0 <=> Vow: Cns:* (%^VSH:|%^AB5:) (%>:) _ (%>:) [ r: | l | n ] %^EPH: ( Special:* ) %>: Vow ; !Vow ;
      where Vx in (a i u) ;
 !Vow was commented out?

!! **Tests:**

!!€ økur^EPH^UUML>um
!!€ øk0r000um
!!€ lykil^EPH>an
!!€ lyk0l00an
!!€ aftan^EPH>
!!€ aftan00
!!€ vakin^EPH>ir
!!€ vak0n00ir



"U-umlaut of Epenthetic vowel"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 a:u <=> a: m _ Cns: %^EPH: %^UUML: (%^UUML:) #:0 ;
! check the double umlaut marking...
! question is whether Fem umlaut is always there.

!! **Tests:**

!!€ gamal^EPH^UUML
!!€ gomul00
!!€ gamal^EPH^UUML>u
!!€ goml000u


!! ### Umlaut rules

"U-umlaut in Front of Nasal"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 Vx:Vy <=> _ Nas (Cns:)  Vow: (Cns:)  %^EPH: %^UUML: ;
         _ Nas (Cns:)       (Cns:)         %^UUML: ;
!        _ Nas (Cns:)  Vow: (Cns:)         %^UUML: ; !Needed???
	where Vx in ( a a3 )
		  Vy in ( o ø  )
		  matched ;
	
!!€ tank^UUML
!!€ tonk0
!den skal heller ikke klare det. den skal klare tonkum, og det gjør den.

!! **Tests:**

!!€ band^UUML
!!€ bond00
!!€ hamar^EPH^UUML>um
!!€ hom0r000um

"General U-umlaut"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
  a:ø <=> _ NonNas: NonNas:* (Nas) (Vow:) %^UUML: ;
  
!! **Tests:**

!!€ dag^UUML>um
!!€ døg00um
!!€ sag^UUML>a
!!€ søg00a
!!€ all^UUML>
!!€ øll00


"U-umlaut for akur"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
  a:ø <=> _ k u:0 r (%^EPH:) %^UUML: %>: u ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ akur^EPH^UUML>um
!!€ øk0r000um

"I-umlaut"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 Vx:Vy <=> _ Cns:* %^IUML: ; !(Dummy:) [ %>: i | %>: u r | (%>: Cns:*) #: | %>: g ] ;
     where Vx in ( a o u ø á ó ú )
	       Vy in ( e y y i æ ø ý )
	   matched ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ dag^IUML>i
!!€ deg00i
!!€ son^IUML>i
!!€ syn00i
!!€ bógv^IUML>i
!!€ bøg000i
!!€ ung^IUMLr>i
!!€ yng0r0i
!!€ fjørð^IUML>i
!!€ f0irð00i



"eI-umlaut"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** for o:e, á:e, i:e
 Vx:Vy <=> _ Cns:* %^eIUML: ;
    where Vx in ( o á i )
          Vy in ( e e e )
   matched;

"I-umlaut for bróðir" ! also for other words?
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 ó:ø <=> _ Cns:* u: r ( %^EPH: ) %^IUML: ;


"Inverted U-umlaut from ø"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 ø:a <=> _ Cns* (Vow: Cns) ( %^EPH: ) %^OEA: ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ fløtt^OEAa
!!€ flatt0a

"Inverted U-umlaut from o"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 o:a <=> _ Cns* (Vow: Cns) ( %^EPH: ) %^OA: ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ fonn^OA>ar
!!€ fann00ar


"o/ei-Umlaut I"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 e:o <=> _ i: Cns:+ %^EIO: ;
